District of Columbia statutes.
47-857.10

Tax abatements for new residential developments — Regulations.

The Mayor shall promulgate regulations to implement §§ 47-857.01 through 47-857.09 within 180 days after the effective date of this section [April 19, 2002].

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 601(b), 49 DCR 1468

History

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 14-183, the “Housing Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-155, September 13, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8623).

Delegation of Authority